Connecticut, session 2026, HB05170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ___ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Addiction Services, from the General Fund, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Survivors of
Homicide, Inc.